Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 25.30.800.
Proceedings governed by other law.

This chapter does not govern an adoption proceeding or a proceeding pertaining to the authorization of emergency medical care for a child.

A child custody proceeding that pertains to an Indian child as defined in 25 U.S.C. 1901 — 1963 (Indian Child Welfare Act) is not subject to this chapter to the extent that it is governed by 25 U.S.C. 1901 — 1963 (Indian Child Welfare Act).

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.810.
International application of chapter.

A court of this state shall treat a foreign country as if it were a state of the United States for the purpose of applying AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a child custody determination made in a foreign country under factual circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of this chapter shall be recognized and enforced under AS

25.30.400

—

25.30.590

.

A court of this state is not required to apply this chapter to a child custody determination made in a foreign country when the child custody law of the other country violates fundamental principles of human rights.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Collateral references. —

Applicability and application of Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (UCCJEA) to international child custody and support actions, 66 ALR6th 269.

Sec. 25.30.820.
Effect of child custody determination.

A child custody determination made by a court of this state that had jurisdiction under this chapter binds all persons who have been served notice under Rule 4, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, who have been notified under AS

25.30.840

, or who have submitted to the jurisdiction of the court, and who have been given an opportunity to be heard. As to those persons, the determination is conclusive as to all decided issues of law and fact except to the extent the determination is modified.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.830.
Priority.

If a question of existence or exercise of jurisdiction under this chapter is raised in a child custody proceeding, the question, on request of a party, shall be given priority on the calendar and handled expeditiously.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.840.
Notice to persons outside the state.

Notice required for the exercise of jurisdiction when a person is outside this state may be given under Rule 4, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, or in a manner prescribed by the law of the state in which the service is made. Notice shall be given in a manner reasonably calculated to give actual notice but may be by publication if other means are not effective.

Proof of service may be made under Rule 4, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, or in the manner prescribed by the law of the state in which the service is made.

Notice is not required for the exercise of jurisdiction with respect to a person who submits to the jurisdiction of the court.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on court rules, see § 5, ch. 133, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 25.30.850.
Appearance and limited immunity.

A party to a child custody proceeding, including a modification proceeding, or a petitioner or respondent in a proceeding to enforce or register a child custody determination is not subject to personal jurisdiction in this state for another proceeding or purpose solely because of having participated, or having been physically present for the purpose of participating, in the proceeding.

A party who is subject to personal jurisdiction in this state on a basis other than physical presence is not immune from service of process in this state. A party present in the state who is subject to the jurisdiction of another state is not immune from service of process allowable under the laws of that state.

The immunity granted by (a) of this section does not extend to civil litigation based on acts unrelated to the participation in a proceeding under this chapter committed by an individual while present in this state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.860.
Communication between courts.

A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter.

The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. If the parties are not able to participate in the communication, they shall be given the opportunity to present facts and legal arguments before a decision on jurisdiction is made.

Communication between courts on schedules, calendars, court records, and similar matters may occur without informing the parties, and a record need not be made of the communication.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a record shall be made of a communication under this section. The parties must be informed promptly of the communication and granted access to the record.

In this section, “record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.870.
Taking testimony in another state.

In addition to other procedures available to a party, a party to a child custody proceeding may offer testimony of witnesses who are located in another state, including testimony of the parties and the child, by deposition or other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in another state. The court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a person be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms on which the testimony is taken.

A court of this state may permit an individual residing in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone, audiovisual means, or other electronic means before a designated court or at another location in that state. A court of this state shall cooperate with courts of other states in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a court of this state by technological means that do not produce an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)

Sec. 25.30.880.
Cooperation between courts; preservation of records.

A court of this state may request the appropriate court of another state to

hold an evidentiary hearing;

order a person to produce or give evidence under procedures of that state;

order that an evaluation be made with respect to the custody of a child involved in a pending proceeding;

forward to the court of this state a certified copy of the transcript of the record of the hearing, the evidence otherwise presented, and any evaluation prepared in compliance with the request; and

order a party to a child custody proceeding or a person having physical custody of the child to appear in the proceeding with or without the child.

On request of a court of another state, a court of this state may hold a hearing or enter an order described in (a) of this section.

Travel and other necessary and reasonable expenses incurred under (a) and (b) of this section may be assessed against the parties according to the law of this state.

A court of this state shall preserve the pleadings, orders, decrees, records of hearings, evaluations, and other pertinent records with respect to a child custody proceeding until the child attains 18 years of age. On appropriate request by a court or law enforcement official of another state, the court shall forward a certified copy of these records.

History.

(§ 2 ch 133 SLA 1998)